Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 10-118, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 10-118. A. Notwithstanding any other section of law to
the contrary, no person or entity shall impose an accident response
fee for the response or investigation of a motor vehicle accident by
law enforcement, fire department, or municipality; provided,
however, that this prohibition shall not apply to a volunteer fire
department.
B. For purposes of this section, “accident response fee” means
a fee imposed for the response or investigation of a motor vehicle

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3045 Page 1

acci dent and does not mean any fee otherwise specifically authorized
by law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 3045 Page 2